Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2398.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1144. Flood evacuation plans for organized camps.(a) Evacuation plans.--The governing body of each municipality shall require the operator of an organized camp located within 500 feet of a special flood hazard area to prepare and maintain a written flood evacuation plan for the camp premises.(b) Filing and review.--The operator of an organized camp shall file a copy of the flood evacuation plan with the municipality and the county emergency management agency and <--1234567891011121314151617 shall review and update the plan annually before the camp opens for the camp season.(c) Posting and distribution.--The operator of an organized camp shall have the following duties:(1) Post a diagram or summary of evacuation routes and safe locations in each sleeping or dining facility within the camp premises.(2) Provide a copy or summary of the flood evacuation plan to adult campers or parents or guardians of children and youth campers before each camp season.(d) Enforcement.--A municipality may condition the issuance or renewal of any license, permit or zoning approval for an organized camp on compliance with this section.(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Operator." A person who owns or manages an organized camp."Organized camp." A s defined in section 1 of the act of November 10, 1959 (P.L.1400, No.497), entitled "An act providing for the annual registration of organized camps for children, youth and adults; defining the duties of the Department of Health of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania; and prescribing penalties.""Special flood hazard area." Land in a floodplain having a 1% or greater annual probability of flooding as identified by the Federal Emergency Management Agency on a Flood Insurance Rate Map or Digital Flood Insurance Rate Map.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.AMENDING TITLE 35 (HEALTH AND SAFETY) OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES, IN LOCAL ORGANIZATIONS AND SERVICES, PROVIDING FOR FLOOD EVACUATION PLANS FOR ORGANIZED CAMPS.20260HB2398PN3729 - 2 - <--12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728293031 THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA HEREBY ENACTS AS FOLLOWS:SECTION 1. TITLE 35 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:§ 7505. FLOOD EVACUATION PLANS FOR ORGANIZED CAMPS.(A) EVACUATION PLANS.--(1) THE GOVERNING BODY OF EACH POLITICAL SUBDIVISION SHALL REQUIRE THE OPERATOR OF AN ORGANIZED CAMP LOCATED WITHIN 500 FEET OF A SPECIAL FLOOD HAZARD AREA TO ESTABLISH AND MAINTAIN A WRITTEN FLOOD EVACUATION PLAN FOR THE CAMP PREMISES.(2) AN EXECUTIVE AGENCY OPERATING AN ORGANIZED CAMP LOCATED WITHIN 500 FEET OF A SPECIAL FLOOD HAZARD AREA SHALL ESTABLISH AND MAINTAIN, OR SHALL CAUSE A LESSEE TO ESTABLISH AND MAINTAIN, A WRITTEN FLOOD EVACUATION PLAN FOR THE CAMP PREMISES.(B) FILING AND REVIEW.--(1) THE OPERATOR OF AN ORGANIZED CAMP, INCLUDING AN EXECUTIVE AGENCY, SHALL FILE A COPY OF THE FLOOD EVACUATION PLAN WITH THE AGENCY AND EACH COUNTY EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT AGENCY AND LOCAL EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT ORGANIZATIONS OF JURISDICTION WHERE THE ORGANIZED CAMP IS LOCATED.(2) THE FLOOD EVACUATION PLAN SHALL BE REVIEWED ANNUALLY AND MODIFIED AS NECESSARY BY THE OPERATOR, INCLUDING AN EXECUTIVE AGENCY, IN CONSULTATION WITH EACH COUNTY EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT AGENCY AND LOCAL EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT ORGANIZATION OF JURISDICTION WHERE THE ORGANIZED CAMP IS LOCATED, BEFORE THE CAMP OPENS FOR THE CAMP SEASON.(C) POSTING AND DISTRIBUTION.--THE OPERATOR OF AN ORGANIZED CAMP SHALL HAVE THE FOLLOWING DUTIES:20260HB2398PN3729 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) POST A DIAGRAM OR SUMMARY OF EVACUATION ROUTES AND SAFE LOCATIONS IN EACH SLEEPING AND DINING FACILITY WITHIN THE CAMP PREMISES.(2) PROVIDE A COPY OR SUMMARY OF THE FLOOD EVACUATION PLAN TO ADULT CAMPERS OR PARENTS OR GUARDIANS OF CHILDREN AND YOUTH CAMPERS BEFORE EACH CAMP SEASON.(D) ENFORCEMENT.--A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION MAY CONDITION THE ISSUANCE OR RENEWAL OF ANY LICENSE, PERMIT OR ZONING APPROVAL FOR AN ORGANIZED CAMP ON COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SECTION. A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE AGENCY, SHALL ENSURE THAT THE FLOOD EVACUATION PLAN ESTABLISHED BY THE OPERATOR REMAINS COMPLIANT WITH FLOODPLAIN MANAGEMENT PLANS, REQUIREMENTS AND PROTOCOLS.(E) DEFINITIONS.--AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SUBSECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"OPERATOR." A PERSON WHO OWNS OR MANAGES AN ORGANIZED CAMP. "ORGANIZED CAMP." A S DEFINED IN SECTION 1 OF THE ACT OF NOVEMBER 10, 1959 (P.L.1400, NO.497), ENTITLED "AN ACT PROVIDING FOR THE ANNUAL REGISTRATION OF ORGANIZED CAMPS FOR CHILDREN, YOUTH AND ADULTS; DEFINING THE DUTIES OF THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA; AND PRESCRIBING PENALTIES.""SPECIAL FLOOD HAZARD AREA." LAND IN A FLOODPLAIN HAVING A 1% OR GREATER ANNUAL PROBABILITY OF FLOODING AS IDENTIFIED BY THE FEDERAL EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT AGENCY ON A FLOOD INSURANCE RATE MAP OR DIGITAL FLOOD INSURANCE RATE MAP.SECTION 2. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 60 DAYS.20260HB2398PN3729 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728